Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1529
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Environmental Protection Act shall be construed to:

(1) Grant to the department any jurisdiction or authority with respect to air contamination existing solely within commercial and industrial plants, works, or shops or private property appurtenant thereto;

(2) Affect the relations between employers and employees with respect to or arising out of any condition of air contamination or air pollution; or

(3) Supersede or limit the applicability of any law or ordinance relating to sanitation, industrial health, or safety.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 29;

Laws 1987, LB 152, § 11.